src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_HURTTI
!!  Stems with quantitative t gradation, i final and back harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻C.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~0 back
!!€  hurtti: hurtti+A+Sg+Nom # grunchy
!!€  hurtissa: hurtti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hurtteina: hurtti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hurteista: hurtti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  hurttien: hurtti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  hurtimpi: hurtti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  hurtein: hurtti+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VÄÄRTTI
!!  Stems with quantitative t gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻C.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~0 front
!!€  väärtti: väärtti+A+Sg+Nom # worthy
!!€  väärtissä: väärtti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  väärtteinä: väärtti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  väärteistä: väärtti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  väärttien: väärtti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  väärtimpi: väärtti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  väärtein: väärtti+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no bisyllabic adjectives ending in vowel and gradating -pi.

LEXICON ADJ_TUHTI
!!  Stems with t ~ d gradation, i final and back harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻F.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~d back
!!€  tuhti: tuhti+A+Sg+Nom # stocky
!!€  tuhdissa: tuhti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  tuhteina: tuhti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  tuhdeista: tuhti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  tuhtien: tuhti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tuhdimpi: tuhti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  tuhdein: tuhti+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:di  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:di  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_REHTI
!!  Stems with t ~ d gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻F.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~d front
!!€  rehti: rehti+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  rehdissä: rehti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  rehteinä: rehti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  rehdeistä: rehti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  rehtien: rehti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  rehdimpi: rehti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  rehdein: rehti+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:di  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:di  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjectives with i stems with other gradations.

!!  !Trisyllabic and longer i stems

LEXICON ADJ_ABNORMAALI
!!  The i stems with trisyllabic allomorph sets have class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and
!!  dictionary class of ⁶.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 6 back
!!€  abnormaali: abnormaali+A+Sg+Nom # abnormal
!!€  abnormaaleja: abnormaali+A+Pl+Par
!!€  abnormaaleiden: abnormaali+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  abnormaalimpi: abnormaali+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  abnormaalein: abnormaali+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI
!!  The i stems with trisyllabic allomorph sets have class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and
!!  dictionary class of ⁶.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 6 front
!!€  öykkäri: öykkäri+A+Sg+Nom # chav
!!€  öykkärejä: öykkäri+A+Pl+Par
!!€  öykkäreiden: öykkäri+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  öykkärimpi: öykkäri+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  öykkärein: öykkkäri+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;


!!  There are no adjectives acting like nouns where i-final nominatives have
!!  singular e stems.

!!  !Bisyllabic A-stem adjectives
!!  The a stems differ from regular nouns in one more feature: some of them,
!!  but not all, have a:e variation before the comparative stem. The selection
!!  of this feature may be phonological, but it is complex, and often there
!!  is variation between speakers. The plural partitives and genitives are a
!!  good indicator of classificaion of a, ä final stems, as are the vowels
!!  of comparative and plural stems.

LEXICON ADJ_AAVA
!!  Bisyllabic a stems with e comparative and j plurals are in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and dictionary class ⁹.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 9
!!€  aava: aava+A+Sg+Nom # open (of fields, plains)
!!€  aavaa: aava+A+Sg+Par
!!€  aavana: aava+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  aavassa: aava+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  aavoina: aava+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  aavojen: aava+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  aavoihin: aava+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  aavempi: aava+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  aavoin: aava+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TARKKA
!!  The ka stem with e comparative and j plurals is {{@LEXNAME@}}, and the 
!!  dictionary class is ⁹-A or ⁹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 9 k~0
!!€  tarkka: tarkka+A+Sg+Nom # pedantic
!!€  tarkkaa: tarkka+A+Sg+Par
!!€  tarkkana: tarkka+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  tarkassa: tarkka+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  tarkkoina: tarkka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  tarkkojen: tarkka+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tarkkoihin: tarkka+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  tarkempi: tarkka+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  tarkoin: tarkka+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RAAKA

:  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0:’a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:’o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

:’e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  No a final adjectives with quantitative p gradation.
