src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aituri+A:aitur  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
akuutti+A:akuut  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
ambivertti+A:ambivert  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
banaali+A:banaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
brutaali+A:brutaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
charmantti+A:charmant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
debiili+A:debiil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
dementti+A:dement  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
diskreetti+A:diskreet  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
efferentti+A:efferent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
elegantti+A:elegant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
epäkongruentti+A:epä#kongruent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
epänormaali+A:epä#normaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
epästandardi+A:epä#standard  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
epätarkka+A:epätark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
epävarma+A:epä#varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
evidentti+A:evident  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
fataali+A:fataal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
frekventti+A:frekvent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
hallanarka+A:hallanar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
harva+A:harv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
hirmuhauska+A:hirmuhausk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
honkkeli+A:honkkel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
huipputarkka+A:huipputark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
höntti+A:hönt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
höveli+A:hövel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
ihmisarka+A:ihmisar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
ikivanha+A:ikivanh  ADJ_AAVA  ;
immanentti+A:immanent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
indifferentti+A:indifferent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
inertti+A:inert  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
intelligentti+A:intelligent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
intresantti+A:intresant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
kaheli+A:kahel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
keskivahva+A:keski#vahv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
kiltti+A:kilt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
kimurantti+A:kimurant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
kirkkoherranvirka+A:kirkkoherranvir  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
koheli+A:kohel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
konfluentti+A:konfluent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
konvergentti+A:konvergent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
kserofyytti+A:kserofyyt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
kserofyytti+A:kserofyyt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
kurantti+A:kurant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
kuumanarka+A:kuumanar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
kylmänarka+A:kylmänar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
käyttövarma+A:käyttövarm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
laaka+A:laa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
laaka+A:laa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
langanlaiha+A:langanlaih  ADJ_AAVA  ;
legaali+A:legaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
liika+A:lii  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
lila+A:lil  ADJ_AAVA  ;
militantti+A:militant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
mittatarkka+A:mitta#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
mukoosi+A:mukoos  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
multivalentti+A:multivalent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
murtovarma+A:murto#varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
mäntti+A:mänt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
niukka+A:niuk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
normaali+A:normaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
nätti+A:nät  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
omantunnontarkka+A:omantunnon#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
operantti+A:operant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
paha+A:pah  ADJ_AAVA  ;
palonarka+A:palon#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
paranormaali+A:para#normaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
passeli+A:passel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
patalaiska+A:patalaisk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
pedantti+A:pedant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
pikkutarkka+A:pikku#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
pluripotentti+A:pluripotent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
pomminvarma+A:pommin#varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
preseniili+A:preseniil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
punavioletti+A:punaviolet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
puoliraaka+A:puoliraa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
puoliraaka+A:puoli#raa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
purppuranliila+A:purppuranliil  ADJ_AAVA  ;
purulentti+A:purulent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
raaka+A:raa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
raaka+A:raa  ADJ_RAAKA  ;
raikuli+A:raikul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
rankka+A:rank  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
rehti+A:reh  ADJ_REHTI  ;
resistentti+A:resistent  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
reversiibeli+A:reversiibel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
riuska+A:riusk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
ruskeanvioletti+A:ruskean#violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
sanatarkka+A:sanatark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
sekuli+A:sekul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
seniili+A:seniil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
silkka+A:silk  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
simppeli+A:simppel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
sinertävänliila+A:sinertävän#liil  ADJ_AAVA  ;
sinivioletti+A:sini#violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
siviili+A:siviil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
stabiili+A:stabiil  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
steriili+A:steriil  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
syömäri+A:syömär  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
sähköneutraali+A:sähkö#neutraal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
söötti+A:sööt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
taaja+A:taaj  ADJ_AAVA  ;
tarkka+A:tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
tikunlaiha+A:tikunlaih  ADJ_AAVA  ;
tomppeli+A:tomppel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
totipontentti+A:totipontent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
tuhti+A:tuh  ADJ_TUHTI  ;
tulenarka+A:tulen#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
turhantarkka+A:turhan#tark  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
ultravioletti+A:ultra#violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
umpilaiska+A:umpi#laisk  ADJ_AAVA  ;
uusvanha+A:uusvanh  ADJ_AAVA  ;
valonarka+A:valon#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
variaabeli+A:variaabel  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
varma+A:varm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
vekkuli+A:vekkul  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
vesseli+A:vessel  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
vilunarka+A:vilun#ar  ADJ_TARKKA  ;
vitaali+A:vitaal  ADJ_ABNORMAALI  ;
voitonvarma+A:voitonvarm  ADJ_AAVA  ;
väkivahva+A:väkivahv  ADJ_AAVA  ;
väärtti+A:väärt  ADJ_VÄÄRTTI  ;
öykkäri+A:öykkär  ADJ_ÖYKKÄRI  ;
